Arkansas, session 2025, HB2005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 10, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 5 - Train Length

23-10-501. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that trains of excessive length
operating on a main line or branch line in this state expose the public to
unnecessary danger and disruption of commerce.
(b) The General Assembly intends for this subchapter to create a
requirement concerning train length that will eliminate disruptions of
commerce and the danger imposed on communities and the general citizenry by
trains of excessive length.
*ZRC136*
04/10/2025 9:10:20 AM ZRC136

HB2005

23-10-502. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Branch line" means a secondary railroad track that branches
off from a main line;
(2)(A) "Main line" means:
(i) A Class I railroad that is documented in current
timetables filed by the Class I railroad with the Federal Railroad
Administrator under 49 C.F.R. § 217.7, as it existed on January 1, 2025, over
which five million (5,000,000) or more gross tons of railroad traffic is
transported annually; or
(ii) A railroad used for regularly scheduled
intercity or commuter rail passenger services.
(B) "Main line" does not include a railroad used for a
tourist, scenic, historic, or excursion operation;
(3)(A) "Railroad" means nonhighway ground transportation that
runs on rails or electromagnetic guideways in this state.
(B) "Railroad" includes without limitation a:
(i) Commuter railroad service or other short-haul
railroad passenger service in a metropolitan or suburban area; and
(ii) High-speed ground transportation system that
connects metropolitan areas without regard to whether the high-speed ground
transportation system uses new technologies not associated with traditional
railroads.
(C) "Railroad" does not include a rapid transit operation
in an urban area that is not connected to the general railroad system of
transportation;
(4) "Railroad corporation" means a corporation, company, or
individual that owns or operates a railroad in this state as an owner,
lessee, mortgagee, trustee, assignee, or receiver;
(5)(A) "Train" means a locomotive, multiple locomotives coupled
together, or one (1) or more locomotives coupled with one (1) or more cars
that require an air brake test under 49 C.F.R. Part 232, as it existed on
January 1, 2025, or 49 C.F.R. Part 238, as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(B) "Train" does not include:
(i) A locomotive or car during switching operations;
04/10/2025 9:10:20 AM ZRC136

HB2005
or
(ii) A locomotive or car that is operated to
classify and assemble cars within a railroad yard for the purpose of making
or breaking up trains; and
(6) "Train length" means the measurement of the total length of
a train operating on a main line or a branch line within this state.

23-10-503. Train length — Penalty — Collection.
(a) A railroad corporation or an individual shall not run a train or
permit a train to be run on any part of a main line or branch line that has a
train length of eight thousand five hundred feet (8,500') or greater.
(b)(1)(A) A railroad corporation or an individual that violates this
section is subject to a civil penalty of no less than five hundred dollars
($500) and no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each foot of train
length over the limitation stated in subsection (a) of this section.
(B) A railroad corporation or an individual shall be
subject to an additional civil penalty under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this
section for each day that the railroad corporation continues to operate a
train in violation of subsection (a) of this section.
(2) A railroad corporation or an individual that violates
subsection (a) of this section is subject to a one-time civil penalty of up
to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) if the Director of State
Highways and Transportation finds:
(A) The violation to be grossly negligent; or
(B) That a pattern of repeated violations has caused:
(i) An imminent hazard of death or injury to an
individual; or
(ii) Death or injury to an individual.
(c) A civil penalty collected under this section shall be deposited
into the Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund to be used for investment
into the infrastructure of the state.
(d) The director shall determine the amount of a civil penalty imposed
under subsection (b) of this section based on:
(1) The nature, circumstances, extent, and gravity of the
violation;
(2) With respect to the violator, the:
04/10/2025 9:10:20 AM ZRC136

HB2005
(A) Degree of the violator's culpability;
(B) Violator's history of violations;
(C) Violator's ability to pay; and
(D) Effect on the violator's ability to continue to do
business; and
(3) Any other factors required by law.
(e)(1) The director shall refer a civil penalty assessed under this
section to the Attorney General for collection of the civil penalty.
(2) After the Attorney General has received adequate information
from the director to proceed with the collection of a civil penalty imposed
under this section, the Attorney General shall bring a civil action to
collect the amount of the civil penalty imposed under subsection (b) of this
section in the district court of the county in which:
(A) The violation occurred;
(B) The defendant has its principal executive office, if
the defendant is a railroad corporation; or
(C) The defendant resides, if the defendant is an
individual.
(3) A civil action under this subsection shall be brought within
three (3) years of the violation.
(4) In a proceeding under this subsection, a railroad
corporation is deemed to have knowledge of the acts of its officers, agents,
and employees.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that maintaining safe operating
practices by railroads is essential to the day-to-day operations and commerce
of this state; that maintaining sensible limitations on train length will
ensure the safety of the residents of this state and help to alleviate and
avoid the consequences of failing to maintain sensible limitations on train
length that other states have suffered; that no industry may act
irresponsibly by needlessly placing the desires of shareholders above the
state, counties, and municipalities in which the industry operates; and that
this act is immediately necessary because it demonstrates that this state
values its transportation infrastructure, uninterrupted commerce, first
responders, law enforcement, and firefighters and that the state will not
04/10/2025 9:10:20 AM ZRC136

HB2005
overlook the importance of the state's duty to protect its residents.
Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately
necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall
become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.


























04/10/2025 9:10:20 AM ZRC136